Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF419.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2197HH (2) 91 jm/jh H.F. 419 Section 1. Section 423.3, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 111. a. The sales price of lodging 3 supplies sold to a lodging provider if the lodging supplies are 4 consumed or used by the customer of the lodging provider. 5 b. As used in this subsection: 6 (1) âCustomerâ means a user as defined in section 423A.2. 7 (2) âLodging providerâ means the same as defined in section 8 423A.2. 9 (3) âLodging suppliesâ means toilet tissue, facial tissue, 10 shampoo, conditioner, complimentary toiletries, running water, 11 electrical service provided to a guest room, bottled water, 12 towels, sheets, blankets, pillows, wrapped glasses, coffee 13 cups, television service, pens, paper, phone service, and 14 cleaning supplies. 15